Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Transfer of Probate Jurisdiction to Chancery Court

16-16-201. Probate jurisdiction and administration of estates in chancery court.

In all counties where not otherwise specifically provided by public, private, special or local acts, all jurisdiction relating to the probate of wills and the administration of estates of every nature, including the estates of decedents and of wards under guardianships or conservatorships and related matters previously vested in the county court, the county judge or county chair, is vested in the chancery court of the respective counties. The chancery court in such counties shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the probate of wills and the administration of estates of every nature, including the estates of decedents and of wards under guardianships or conservatorships, and all matters relating thereto, previously vested in the county court.

The clerk and master in such counties shall be authorized and empowered to grant letters of administration and letters testamentary, letters of guardianship and letters of conservatorship, appoint administrators and executors, appoint guardians and conservators, receive and adjudicate all claims, probate wills in common form, determine allowances to the surviving spouse and family of the deceased, preside over the assignment of homestead, preside over proceedings for the elective share, take and state all accounts and settlements, subject to the approval of the chancellor, direct and approve final distributions, and hear and determine all probate matters whether enumerated or not in this subsection (b). The chancellor shall hear all probates in solemn form and may hear such other probate matters as the chancellor may deem proper. All accounts, settlements and final orders of distribution shall be made subject to the approval of the chancellor. All action taken by the clerk and master shall be subject to review by the chancellor by simple motion, petition or the filing of exceptions as may be appropriate.

The court of appeals shall have jurisdiction of appeals from the decisions of the chancery court in such probate matters.

Notwithstanding any private act to the contrary, effective July 1, 2014, in counties having a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) nor more than forty-one thousand one hundred (41,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all jurisdiction relating to the probate of wills and the administration of estates of every nature, including the estates of decedents and of wards under guardianships or conservatorships and related matters presently in the court of general sessions shall be transferred to chancery court. On such date, the chancellor shall assume all duties and responsibilities with respect to the administration of estates, guardian appointments and other probate matters. All probate files, records and other documents maintained in the general sessions or circuit court in such counties shall be transferred to the custody of the clerk and master.

Acts 1980, ch. 875, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1301; Acts 1982, ch. 858, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 3; 2003, ch. 114, § 1; 2014, ch. 756, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 114, § 2 provided that all records, files, papers and other documents, whether electronic or otherwise, relating to probate or the administration of estates in the possession of the county clerk of any county to which former subsection (d) applied prior to July 1, 2003, shall within thirty (30) days of July 1, 2003, be transferred to the clerk and master of any such county.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 756 took effect on April 21, 2014.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 756, § 3. April 21, 2014. [See the Compiler’s Notes.]

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk relating to administration of estates, § 18-6-106.

Powers of court after confirmation of sale of land, § 16-16-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 432.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 36, 38, 42, 44, 45, 123, 338, 535, 555, 572, 832, 837, 852, 892, 896.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 30, 63; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 30, 35; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 6, 7, 12, 15, 54, 66, 71, 78-108, 112; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 5; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, §§ 23, 24; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 45, 51, 59, 66.

16-16-202. Construction of former statutes.

All sections of Tennessee Code Annotated conferring jurisdiction in probate and related matters in the county courts, the county judge or county chair hereafter shall be construed to be applicable to the chancery court in those counties of the state to which this part applies and shall be deemed as amended accordingly. In all other counties the references are to the court having probate jurisdiction.

Acts 1980, ch. 875, § 2; T.C.A., § 16-1302; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 26.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk relating to administration of estates, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 63; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 35; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 45.